North Dakota statutes. TITLE 21 Governmental Finance
CHAPTER 21-10 State Investment Board

21-10-01.
State investment board — Membership — Term — Compensation — Advisory council.

The North Dakota state investment board consists of:

The governor;

The state treasurer;

The commissioner of university and school lands;

The director of workforce safety and insurance;

The insurance commissioner;

Three members of the teachers’ fund for retirement board or the board’s designees who need not be members of the fund as selected by that board;

Two of the elected members of the public employees retirement system board as selected by that board;

One member of the public employees retirement system board as selected by that board; and

One member of the legacy and budget stabilization fund advisory board, as selected by that board, to serve as a nonvoting member.

The director of workforce safety and insurance may appoint a designee, subject to approval by the workforce safety and insurance board of directors, to attend the meetings, participate, and vote when the director is unable to attend. The teachers’ fund for retirement board may appoint an alternate designee with full voting privileges to attend meetings of the state investment board when a selected member is unable to attend. The public employees retirement system board may appoint an alternate designee with full voting privileges from the public employees retirement system board to attend meetings of the state investment board when a selected member is unable to attend.

The members of the state investment board, except elected and appointed officials and the director of workforce safety and insurance or the director’s designee, are entitled to receive as compensation one hundred forty-eight dollars per day and necessary mileage and travel expenses as provided in sections 44-08-04 and 54-06-09 for attending meetings of the state investment board.

The state investment board may establish an advisory council composed of individuals who are experienced and knowledgeable in the field of investments. The state investment board shall determine the responsibilities of the advisory council. Members of the advisory council are entitled to receive the same compensation as provided the members of the advisory board of the Bank of North Dakota and necessary mileage and travel expenses as provided in sections 44-08-04 and 54-06-09.

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 205, § 1; 1985, ch. 284, § 1; 1987, ch. 190, § 4; 1989, ch. 295, § 1; 1989, ch. 667, § 4; 1991, ch. 628, § 2; 1993, ch. 245, § 1; 1997, ch. 432, § 12; 1999, ch. 230, § 1; 2003, ch. 561, § 3; 2009, ch. 514, § 1; 2011, ch. 48, § 5; 2019, ch. 205, § 1, effective August 1, 2019.

21-10-02.
Board — Powers and duties.

The board is charged with the investment of the funds enumerated in section 21-10-06. It shall approve general types of securities for investment by these funds and set policies and procedures regulating securities transactions on behalf of the various funds. Representatives of the funds enumerated in section 21-10-06 may make recommendations to the board in regard to investments.

The board or its designated agents must be custodian of securities purchased on behalf of funds under the management of the board.

The board may appoint an investment director or advisory service, or both, who must be experienced in, and hold considerable knowledge of, the field of investments. The investment director or advisory service shall serve at the pleasure of the board. The investment director or advisory service may be an individual, corporation, limited liability company, partnership, or any legal entity which meets the qualifications established herein. The board may authorize the investment director to lend securities held by the funds. These securities must be collateralized as directed by the board.

The board may create investment fund pools in which the funds identified in section 21-10-06 may invest.

For purposes of investment of the legacy fund, the board shall give preference to investment firms and financial institutions with a presence in the state.

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 205, § 1; 1969, ch. 121, § 5; 1975, ch. 222, § 1; 1977, ch. 217, § 1; 1987, ch. 190, § 5; 1989, ch. 667, § 5; 1991, ch. 256, § 1; 1993, ch. 54, § 106; 2021, ch. 81, § 3, effective July 1, 2021.

21-10-02.1.
Board — Policies on investment goals and objectives and asset allocation.

The governing body of each fund enumerated in section 21-10-06 shall establish policies on investment goals and objectives and asset allocation for each respective fund. The policies must provide for:

The definition and assignment of duties and responsibilities to advisory services and persons employed by the board.

Rate of return objectives, including liquidity requirements and acceptable levels of risk.

Long-range asset allocation goals.

Guidelines for the selection and redemption of investments.

Investment diversification, investment quality, qualification of advisory services, and amounts to be invested by advisory services.

The type of reports and procedures to be used in evaluating performance.

The asset allocation and any subsequent allocation changes for each fund must be approved by the governing body of that fund and the state investment board. The governing body of each fund shall use the staff and consultants of the retirement and investment office in developing asset allocation and investment policies.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 285, § 1; 1989, ch. 667, § 6; 1991, ch. 628, § 3; 2015, ch. 183, § 1, effective August 1, 2015.

21-10-03.
Cooperation with Bank of North Dakota. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1987, ch. 190, § 14.

21-10-04.
Board — Meetings.

The state investment board shall select one of its members to serve as chair, one to serve as vice chair, and shall meet at the call of the chair or upon written notice signed by two members of the board.

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 205, § 1; 1975, ch. 222, § 3; 1985, ch. 284, § 2; 1987, ch. 190, § 6; 1991, ch. 256, § 2; 2011, ch. 179, § 1.

21-10-05.
Investment director — Powers and duties.

Subject to the limitations contained in the law or the policymaking regulations or resolutions adopted by the board, the investment director may sign and execute all contracts and agreements to make purchases, sales, exchanges, investments, and reinvestments relating to the funds under the management of the board. This section is a continuing appropriation of all moneys required for the making of investments of funds under the management of the board. The investment director shall see that moneys invested are at all times handled in the best interests of the funds. Securities or investments may be sold or exchanged for other securities or investments.

The investment director shall formulate and recommend to the investment board for approval investment regulations or resolutions pertaining to the kind or nature of investments and limitations, conditions, and restrictions upon the methods, practices, or procedures for investment, reinvestment, purchase, sale, or exchange transactions that should govern the investment of funds under this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 205, § 1; 1987, ch. 190, § 7; 1991, ch. 256, § 3; 2007, ch. 228, § 1.

21-10-06.
Funds under management of board — Accounts.

Subject to the provisions of section 21-10-02, the board shall invest the following funds:

State bonding fund.

Teachers’ fund for retirement.

State fire and tornado fund.

Workforce safety and insurance fund.

Public employees retirement system.

Insurance regulatory trust fund.

State risk management fund.

Budget stabilization fund.

Water projects stabilization fund.

Health care trust fund.

Cultural endowment fund.

Petroleum tank release compensation fund.

Legacy fund.

Legacy earnings fund.

A fund under contract with the board pursuant to subsection 3.

Separate accounting must be maintained for each of the funds listed in subsection 1. The moneys of the individual funds may be commingled for investment purposes when determined advantageous.

The state investment board may provide investment services to, and manage the money of, any agency, institution, or political subdivision of the state, subject to agreement with the industrial commission. The scope of services to be provided by the state investment board to the agency, institution, or political subdivision must be specified in a written contract. The state investment board may charge a fee for providing investment services and any revenue collected must be deposited in the state retirement and investment fund.

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 205, § 1; 1969, ch. 173, § 8; 1973, ch. 280, § 2; 1983, ch. 419, § 1; 1985, ch. 394, § 1; 1985, ch. 395, § 1; 1985, ch. 397, § 2; 1987, ch. 190, § 8; 1987, ch. 288, § 2; 1989, ch. 69, § 13; 1989, ch. 667, § 7; 1995, ch. 329, § 2; 1997, ch. 329, § 1; 1999, ch. 50, § 38; 2001, ch. 431, § 7; 2003, ch. 561, § 3; 2005, ch. 38, § 5; 2009, ch. 210, § 1; 2011, ch. 179, § 2; 2015, ch. 183, § 2, effective August 1, 2015; 2021, ch. 188, § 2, effective August 1, 2021; 2021, 1st Sp. Sess. ch. 550, § 2, effective December 1, 2021.

Cross-References.

Highway patrolmen’s retirement fund, see N.D.C.C. ch. 39-03.1.

State bonding fund, see N.D.C.C. ch. 26.1-21.

State fire and tornado fund, see N.D.C.C. ch. 26.1-22.

Workmen’s compensation fund, see N.D.C.C. ch. 65-04.

21-10-06.1.
Board — Investment reports.

The board shall annually prepare reports on the investment performance of each fund under its control. The reports must be uniform and must include:

A list of the advisory services managing investments for the board.

A list of investments at market value, compared to previous reporting period, of each fund managed by each advisory service.

Earnings, percentage earned, and change in market value of each fund’s investments.

Comparison of the performance of each fund managed by each advisory service to other funds under the board’s control and to generally accepted market indicators.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 285, § 2; 1991, ch. 256, § 4.

21-10-06.2.
Investment costs.

The amounts necessary to pay for investment costs, such as investment counseling fees, trustee fees, custodial fees, performance measurement fees, expenses associated with money manager searches, expenses associated with onsite audits and reviews of investment managers, and asset allocation expenses, incurred by the state investment board are hereby appropriated and must be paid directly out of the funds listed in section 21-10-06 by the fund incurring the expense.

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 288, § 3; 1989, ch. 667, § 8.

21-10-07.
Legal investments.

The state investment board shall apply the prudent investor rule in investing for funds under its supervision. The “prudent investor rule” means that in making investments the fiduciaries shall exercise the judgment and care, under the circumstances then prevailing, that an institutional investor of ordinary prudence, discretion, and intelligence exercises in the management of large investments entrusted to it, not in regard to speculation but in regard to the permanent disposition of funds, considering probable safety of capital as well as probable income. The retirement funds belonging to the teachers’ fund for retirement and the public employees retirement system must be invested exclusively for the benefit of their members and in accordance with the respective funds’ investment goals and objectives.

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 205, § 1; 1983, ch. 286, § 1; 1985, ch. 286, § 1; 1987, ch. 190, § 9; 1989, ch. 667, § 9.

Cross-References.

Investment of agricultural commodity assessment funds, see N.D.C.C. § 4-24-09.

21-10-07.1.
Prudent investor rule — Exception.

Notwithstanding section 21-10-07, for purposes of investment of the legacy fund, the state investment board shall give preference to qualified investment firms and financial institutions with a presence in the state.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 81, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

21-10-08.
Reserves — Percentage limitations.

In order to meet claims and liabilities, reserves must be established and maintained in each of the funds in accordance with the investment policy and asset allocation established for each fund.

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 205, § 1; 1967, ch. 197, § 1; 1987, ch. 190, § 10; 1991, ch. 256, § 5.

21-10-08.1.
Social investment — Prohibition.

As used in this section, “social investment” means the consideration of socially responsible criteria in the investment or commitment of public funds for the purpose of obtaining an effect other than a maximized return to the state.

Except as otherwise provided in a state investment policy relating to the investment of the legacy fund and unless the state investment board can demonstrate a social investment would provide an equivalent or superior rate of return compared to a similar investment that is not a social investment and has a similar time horizon and risk, the state investment board may not invest state funds for the purpose of social investment.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 189, § 1, effective March 24, 2021.

21-10-09.
Personal profit prohibited — Penalty.

No member, officer, agent, or employee of the state investment board may profit in any manner from transactions on behalf of the funds. Any person violating any of the provisions of this section is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 205, § 1; 1975, ch. 222, § 4; 1989, ch. 667, § 10.

Cross-References.

Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, see N.D.C.C. § 12.1-32-01.

21-10-10.
State investment board fund — Cost of operation of board. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1989, ch. 667, § 13.

21-10-11.
Legacy and budget stabilization fund advisory board.

The legacy and budget stabilization fund advisory board is created to develop recommendations for the investment of funds in the legacy fund and the budget stabilization fund to present to the state investment board.

The goal of investment for the legacy fund is principal preservation while maximizing total return and to provide a direct benefit to the state by investing a portion of the principal in the state. Preference must be given to qualified investment firms and financial institutions with a presence in the state for investment of the legacy fund.

The board shall determine the asset allocation for the investment of the principal of the legacy fund including:

A target allocation of ten percent to fixed income investments within the state, of which:

Up to forty percent must be targeted for infrastructure loans to political subdivisions under section 6-09-49.1. The net return to the legacy fund under this paragraph must be fixed at a target rate of one and one-half percent;

Up to sixty percent, with a minimum of four hundred million dollars, must be designated to the Bank of North Dakota’s certificate of deposit match program with an interest rate fixed at the equivalent yield of United States treasury bonds having the same term, up to a maximum term of twenty years; and

Any remaining amounts must be designated for other qualified fixed income investments within the state.

A target allocation of ten percent to equity investments in the state, of which:

At least three percent may be targeted for investment in one or more equity funds, venture capital funds, or alternative investment funds with a primary strategy of investing in emerging or expanding companies in the state. Equity investments under this paragraph must:

Be managed by qualified investment firms, financial institutions, or equity funds which have a strategy to invest in qualified companies operating or seeking to operate in the state and which have a direct connection to the state; and

Have a benchmark investment return equal to the five-year average net return for the legacy fund, excluding in-state investments.

The legacy and budget stabilization fund advisory board may develop guidelines for other eligible investments under this subdivision.

The board consists of three members of the senate appointed by the senate majority leader, three members of the house of representatives appointed by the house majority leader, the president of the Bank of North Dakota or designee, the tax commissioner or designee, the insurance commissioner or designee, and the state treasurer or designee. The board shall select a member from the senate or house of representatives to serve as chairman for no more than one consecutive year and must meet at the call of the chairman.

The board shall report at least semiannually to the budget section.

Legislative members are entitled to receive compensation and expense reimbursement as provided under section 54-03-20 and reimbursement for mileage as provided by law for state officers. The legislative council shall pay the compensation and expense reimbursement for the legislative members.

The legislative council shall provide staff services to the legacy and budget stabilization fund advisory board.

The staff and consultants of the state retirement and investment office shall advise the board in developing asset allocation and investment policies.

The board may develop a process to select a member of the board who is not a member of the state investment board to serve on the state investment board in a nonvoting capacity.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 179, § 3; 2019, ch. 205, § 2, effective August 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 81, § 4, effective July 1, 2021; 2021, 1st Sp. Sess. ch. 557, § 1, effective December 1, 2021.

21-10-12.
Legacy fund definitions.

For the purposes of section 26 of article X of the Constitution of North Dakota:

“Earnings” means net income in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles, excluding any unrealized gains or losses.

“Principal” means all moneys in the legacy fund not included in earnings as defined under subsection 1.

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 202, § 1; 2021, ch. 188, § 3, effective August 1, 2021.

21-10-13.
Legacy earnings fund — State treasurer — Transfers.

There is created in the state treasury the legacy earnings fund. The fund consists of all moneys transferred to the fund under subsection 2 and all interest and earnings upon moneys in the fund.

Any legacy fund earnings transferred to the general fund at the end of each biennium in accordance with section 26 of article X of the Constitution of North Dakota must be immediately transferred by the state treasurer to the legacy earnings fund.

For each biennium subsequent to the biennium in which the legacy fund earnings are transferred under subsection 2, the amount available for appropriation from the legacy earnings fund is seven percent of the five-year average value of the legacy fund assets as reported by the state investment board. The average value of the legacy fund assets must be calculated using the value of the assets at the end of each fiscal year for the five-year period ending with the most recently completed even-numbered fiscal year.

On July first of each odd-numbered year, from the amount available for appropriation or transfer from the legacy earnings fund for the biennium, the state treasurer shall transfer funding in the following order:

The first one hundred fifty million dollars to the legacy sinking and interest fund under section 6-09.4-10.1.

The next sixty million dollars to the highway tax distribution fund for allocations under section 54-27-19.

Any remaining funds for other purposes as designated by the legislative assembly, including:

Up to fifty million dollars for tax relief pursuant to appropriations or transfers authorized by the legislative assembly;

Up to thirty million dollars to the clean sustainable energy fund pursuant to appropriations or transfers authorized by the legislative assembly; and

Up to thirty million dollars for university research programs, the innovation loan fund to support technology advancement, and workforce enrichment initiatives pursuant to appropriations or transfers authorized by the legislative assembly.

If the amounts transferred under subsection 2 exceed the amount available for appropriation under subsection 3, an amount equal to any appropriations from the legacy sinking and interest fund for bond payments under section 6-09.4-10.1 must be retained in the legacy earnings fund through June 30, 2025, after which an amount equal to twice any appropriations from the legacy sinking and interest fund under section 6-09.4-10.1 for bond payments, but not more than one hundred fifty million dollars, must be retained in the legacy earnings fund. After deducting any amounts to be retained in the legacy earnings fund, the state treasurer shall transfer, within thirty days, any remaining amounts under this subsection in the following order:

The first one hundred million dollars to the legacy fund to become part of the principal.

Any remaining amount to the strategic investment and improvements fund to be used in accordance with the provisions of section 15-08.1-08.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 188, § 4, effective August 1, 2021.